Hawaii statutes.
[§201H‑59] Affordable rental
housing development program. (a) There is established the affordable
rental housing development program under the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation.

(b) The purpose of this program shall be to
preserve affordable rental housing units.

(c) For the purposes of this section,
activities eligible for assistance from the affordable rental housing
development program shall include rehabilitation, acquisition, or preservation
of multifamily rental housing units for persons and families with incomes at or
below eighty per cent of the median family income, as determined by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(d) The corporation shall identify properties
whose contracts with either the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development or the United States Department of Agriculture are set to expire on
or before January 1, 2012, and the corporation shall contact the project owners
to initiate negotiations to renew or preserve the existing subsidy contracts;
provided that:

(1) Nonprofit organizations shall be given priority
to take over expiring subsidy contracts; and

(2) Nonprofit organizations shall be given priority
over for-profit organizations, if federal government funds are needed for the
acquisition or rehabilitation of a project. [L 2011, c 193, §2]

Note

Affordable unit requirements for redeveloped or reconstructed
public housing projects. L 2011, c 193, §4.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next